Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1541.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. State department of corrections; department of public safety; salary increases; delayed repeal A. For any fiscal year that the state general fund does not have a surplus, the state department of corrections may use up to $_____ from the budget stabilization fund established by section 35-144, Arizona Revised Statutes, for the purpose of providing a ten percent salary increase for employees and sworn officers who are employed by the state department of corrections. B. For any fiscal year that the state general fund does not have a surplus, the department of public safety may use up to $_____ from the budget stabilization fund established by section 35-144, Arizona Revised Statutes, for the purpose of providing a ten percent salary increase for employees of the department of public safety. C. This section is repealed from and after June 30, 2029.